North Carolina, session 2025, HB23.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. STANLY COMMUNITY COLLEGE OFF MAIN CAMPUS CULINARY
PROGRAM
SECTION 1. Section 9.15 of S.L. 2017-57 is repealed.
PART II. GULLAH GEECHEE HERITAGE TRAIL
SECTION 2. The General Assembly authorizes the Gullah Geechee
Greenway/Blueway Heritage Trail (Heritage Trail) in Brunswick County. The State shall
support, promote, encourage, and facilitate the establishment of trail segments on State park lands
and on lands of other federal, State, local, and private landowners. On segments of the Heritage
Trail that cross property controlled by agencies or owners other than the State, the laws, rules,
and policies of those agencies or owners shall govern the use of the property.
PART III. STATE PROPERTY TRANSFER TO THE TOWN OF BURGAW
SECTION 3.1. The State of North Carolina shall convey to the Town of Burgaw,
for consideration of one dollar ($1.00), all its rights, titles, and interests in approximately 11 acres
of the approximately 355.73 acre parcel identified with Land Asset ID 6095 in the inventory of
State-owned land maintained by the Department of Administration pursuant to G.S. 143-341.
This is the same property identified with PIN Number 3229-04-1665-0000, as seen in the Office
of the Tax Administrator in Pender County, and is described in part in Deed Book 211, Page 279
and Deed Book 922, Page 191 in the Pender County Register of Deeds. The Department of
Administration, in consultation with the Town of Burgaw, shall determine specifically which
portion of the land described in this section shall be transferred pursuant to this Part.
SECTION 3.2. The conveyance pursuant to Section 3.1 of this Part is subject to a
reversionary interest reserved by the State. The property shall be conveyed to the Town of
Burgaw for so long as it is utilized for public purposes.
SECTION 3.3. The State of North Carolina shall convey the real property described
in Section 3.1 of this Part "as is" and "where is" without warranty. The State makes no
representations or warranties concerning the title to the property, the boundaries of the property,
the uses to which the property may be put, zoning, local ordinances, or any physical,
environmental, health, and safety conditions relating to the property. All costs associated with
the conveyance of the property shall be borne by the Town of Burgaw.
SECTION 3.4. The conveyance of the State's rights, titles, and interests in the real
property described in Section 3.1 of this Part shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 7 of
Chapter 146 of the General Statutes. The conveyance shall comply with the provisions of Article
16 of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, provided that the provisions of G.S. 146-74 shall not
apply.
*H23-v-5*

PART IV. AUTHORIZE ADDING SOUTH FORK PASSAGE STATE TRAIL TO THE
STATE PARKS SYSTEM
SECTION 4.1. The General Assembly finds:
(1) The proposed South Fork Passage Trail corridor offers numerous economic
benefits by expanding and enhancing the existing tourism industry. The
diverse hydrology of the river in the corridor includes shoals, flatwater, class
II rapids, and river tributaries that support a variety of recreational uses.
(2) The South Fork Passage Trail corridor is home to Spencer Mountain, the third
highest peak in the Charlotte region, and the corridor passes through terrain
that is emblematic of the Piedmont region of the State.
(3) The South Fork Passage Trail corridor also contains ecologically important
habitat, including diverse wetlands, hardwood forests, and grasslands, that
support numerous State and federal threatened or endangered species.
(4) The creation of a 60-mile hiking and paddling trail connecting Jacob Fork
Park in Catawba County through Betty G. Ross Park in Lincoln County to
George Poston Park, Goat Island Park, and Daniel Stowe Botanical Garden in
Gaston County would expand existing recreational offerings and support
ongoing efforts to conserve the South Fork of the Catawba River watershed.
SECTION 4.2. The General Assembly authorizes the Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources (Department) to add the South Fork Passage Trail in Catawba, Lincoln, and
Gaston Counties to the State Parks System as a State trail, as provided in G.S. 143B-135.54(b).
The trail, which will run alongside the South Fork River, shall begin at the confluence of the
Henry Fork and Jacob Fork at Jacob Fork Park and end at the boundary between the State and
South Carolina on Lake Wylie.
SECTION 4.3. The Department shall support, promote, encourage, and facilitate the
establishment of trail segments on State Park lands and on lands of other federal, State, local, and
private landowners. On segments of the South Fork Passage State Trail that cross property
controlled by agencies or owners other than the Department's Division of Parks and Recreation,
the laws, rules, and policies of those agencies or owners shall govern the use of the property.
SECTION 4.4. The requirement of G.S. 143B-135.54(b) that additions be
accompanied by adequate appropriations for land acquisition, development, and operations shall
not apply to the authorization set forth in this Part; provided, however, that the State may receive
donations of appropriate land and may purchase other needed lands for the South Fork Passage
State Trail with existing funds in the Land and Water Fund, the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund,
the Complete the Trails Fund, the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund, and other available
sources of funding.
PART V. CODIFY LAKE NORMAN MARINE COMMISSION
SECTION 5.1.(a) Chapter 77 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 6B.
"Lake Norman Marine Commission.
SECTION 5.1.(b) Chapter 1089 of the 1969 Session Laws, as amended by Section
3 of Chapter 494 of the 1991 Session Laws and Section 1 of Chapter 797 of the 1991 Session
Laws, is codified in Article 6B of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, as enacted by subsection
(a) of this section, as follows:
Section of 1969 Session Law G.S. Section
Section 1 G.S. 77-89.1
Section 2 G.S. 77-89.2
Section 3 G.S. 77-89.3
Page 2 Session Law 2025-67 House Bill 23

Section 4 G.S. 77-89.4
Section 5 G.S. 77-89.5
Section 6 G.S. 77-89.6
Section 7 G.S. 77-89.7
Section 8, as amended G.S. 77-89.8
Section 9 G.S. 77-89.10
SECTION 5.1.(c) Article 6B of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, as enacted by
subsection (a) of this section and as amended by subsection (b) of this section, reads as rewritten:
"Article 6B.
"Lake Norman Marine Commission.
"§ 77-89.1. Definitions.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the The following definitions apply in this
Act:Article:
(1) Board: Board. – The board of commissioners publicly elected governing board
of one of the four counties.participating local governments.
(2) Commission: Commission. – The Lake Norman Marine Commission or its
governing board, as the case may be.Commission.
(3) Commissioner: Member Commissioner. – A member of the governing board
of the Lake Norman Marine Commission.
(4) Eligible local governments. ‒ Each of the four counties.
(4)(5) Four counties: Four counties. – Catawba, Iredell, Lincoln, and Mecklenburg
Counties.
(5)(6) Joint resolution: resolution. – A resolution substantially identical in content
adopted separately by the board in of each of the four counties.participating
local governments.
(6)(7) Lake Norman: Norman. – The impounded body of water along the Catawba
River in the four counties extending from the bridge crossing of Rural Road
1004 base of Lookout Shoals Dam downstream to Cowans Ford Dam.Dam
and lying below the full pond elevation of 760 feet above mean sea level based
on the National Geodetic Vertical Datum of 1929.
(8) Participating local government. ‒ Any of the eligible local governments that
have adopted a resolution to participate in the Commission and have not
withdrawn.
(7)(9) Shoreline area: area. – Except as modified by a joint resolution of the four
counties, participating local governments, the area within the four counties
lying within one mile 50 feet landward of the mean high water line full pond
elevation contour of Lake Norman. In addition, the shoreline area shall include
This term also includes all islands within Lake Norman and all peninsulas
extending into the waters of Lake Norman.
(8)(10) Wildlife Commission: Resources Commission. – The North Carolina Wildlife
Resources Commission.Commission established under Article 24 of Chapter
143 of the General Statutes.
"§ 77-89.2. Creation of Commission authorized.
(a) The counties of Catawba, Iredell, Lincoln, and Mecklenburg are hereby authorized
Three or more of the eligible local governments may by joint resolution to create the Lake
Norman Marine Commission. Upon its creation creation, the Commission shall enjoy the powers
and have the duties has the powers, duties, and responsibilities conferred upon it by the joint
resolution, subject to the provisions of this Act. Article. The provisions of any joint resolution
may be modified, amended, or rescinded by a subsequent joint resolution. The purpose of the
Lake Norman Marine Commission is to ensure the coordinated governance applicable to Lake
House Bill 23 Session Law 2025-67 Page 3

Norman and its shoreline area concerning all matters related to public recreation and water
quality and safety.
(b) A county participating local government may unilaterally withdraw from
participation as required by any joint resolution or the provisions of this Act, Article, once the
Commission has been created, and any county participating local government may unilaterally
withdraw from said commission at the end of any budget period. the Commission by resolution
of its board upon the conclusion of the informal settlement discussion provided in subsection
(b1) of this section, not to exceed 90 days after the participating local government delivers to the
Commission its notice of intent to withdraw.
(b1) Upon providing the Commission with notice of intent to withdraw, the participating
local government and the Commission shall jointly appoint a mediation officer. The mediation
officer shall make a reasonable effort to initiate settlement discussions between the participating
local government and all other interested parties.
(c) Upon withdrawing from the Commission, a local government is no longer obligated
to continue any financial or in-kind support of the Commission. By joint resolution of the
participating local governments, presented to and approved by the Commission, an eligible local
government may rejoin the Commission as a participating local government.
(d) Upon If upon the effectuation of such withdrawal, the withdrawal there are fewer than
three counties that remain as participating local governments, the Commission is dissolved until
reestablished under the provisions of this Act Article or any successor act, and all property of the
Commission shall be distributed to or divided among the four counties participating local
governments and any other public agency or agencies serving the Lake Norman area in a manner
deemed equitable by the four counties.participating local governments.
"§ 77-89.3. Terms of members.Membership; terms of office; eligibility for appointment.
(a) Upon its creation, the Commission shall have has a governing board of five
commissioners. Except as otherwise provided for the first five-year period, each commissioner
shall serve a five-year term, with commissioners to serve overlapping terms so that one
commissioner appointment is made each year. Upon creation of the Commission, the board of
Catawba County shall appoint two commissioners and the boards of the other three counties shall
appoint one each. These initial appointees shall serve until September 30 following their
appointment. Thereafter, appointments shall be made each October 1 by the respective boards of
the four counties as follows:comprised of members appointed in accordance with subsections (b)
and (c) of this section.
(1) First year: Commissioner from Catawba, one-year term; commissioner from
Iredell, two-year term; commissioner from Lincoln, three-year term;
commissioner from Mecklenburg, four-year term; commissioner from
Catawba, five-year term.
(2) Second year: Commissioner from Iredell, five-year term.
(3) Third year: Commissioner from Lincoln, five-year term.
(4) Fourth year: Commissioner from Mecklenburg, five-year term.
(5) Fifth year: Commissioner from Catawba, five-year term.
(6) Sixth and succeeding years: appointments for five-year terms in rotation by
county in the order set out above.
(b) Each participating local government shall appoint two members to the Commission,
each of whom shall be individuals who have demonstrated proficiency in community
engagement and consensus-building across multiple stakeholder groups. For the initial
appointments, each participating local government shall appoint one commissioner to serve a
four-year term and a second commissioner to serve a five-year term. Except as otherwise
provided for the initial appointments, each commissioner shall serve a five-year term.
(c) The commissioners appointed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall
select one at-large commissioner for a five-year term, subject to confirmation by joint resolution
Page 4 Session Law 2025-67 House Bill 23

of all of the participating local governments. The at-large commissioner shall be an individual
who has proficient knowledge of boater safety protocols and who possesses one or more of the
following qualifications:
(1) Has served in the United States Coast Guard or a similar maritime
organization with a long-standing tradition of leadership in promoting the
safety and security of the navigable waterways of the United States.
(2) Has knowledge of water quality and aquatic vegetation management.
(3) Has experience in law enforcement.
(4) Has experience in public recreation management.
(5) Has experience in wildlife resources management.
(d) No more than thirty-five percent (35%) of the commissioners serving at any given
time may reside in the same county.
(e) No commissioner shall have any ownership interest in, or financial relationship with,
any business or property that is dependent on income generated from Lake Norman, or that
otherwise presents a conflict of interest with the purposes or responsibilities of the Commission.
(f) Each commissioner shall complete a written disclosure statement by January 31 of
each year that identifies any conflicts of interest he or she has, including any conflicts identified
in subsection (e) of this section. These annual disclosures shall be posted on a public website
maintained by the Commission by January 31 each year.
(g) A commissioner appointed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall maintain
his or her primary residence in the county that appointed the commissioner, and shall reside at
this location for at least nine months every calendar year. The at-large commissioner appointed
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall maintain his or her primary residence at a location
within any of the four counties and shall reside at this location for at least nine months every
calendar year.
(h) In the event of death of a commissioner, resignation, incapacity or inability to serve,
as determined by the board appointing such the commissioner, or removal of the commissioner
for cause, as determined by the board appointing such the commissioner, the that board affected
may appoint another commissioner to fill the unexpired term.
"§ 77-89.4. Compensation; budgetary and accounting procedures.
No commissioner shall receive compensation in the form of salary, wages, fees, or other
forms of compensation for serving as a commissioner. The joint resolution of the four counties
participating local governments shall state the terms relating to compensation to commissioners,
if any, the compensation of consultants and staff members employed by the Commission, and
reimbursement of expenses incurred by commissioners, consultants, and employees. The
Commission shall be is governed by such any budgetary and accounting procedures as may be
specified by joint resolution.
"§ 77-89.5. Organization and meetings.
(a) Upon creation of the Commission, its governing board shall meet at a time and place
agreed upon by the boards of the four counties concerned. participating local governments. The
commissioners shall elect a chairman chair and such any other officers as that they may choose.
choose, except that no commissioner may serve as chair for more than two consecutive terms.
All officers shall serve one-year terms. The governing board shall adopt such rules and
regulations as it may deem necessary, not inconsistent with the provisions of this Act Article or
of any joint resolution, for the proper discharge of its duties and for the governance of the
Commission. The chairman chair may appoint such committees as may be that have been
authorized by such rules and regulations. regulation. The Commission shall meet regularly at
such any times and places as may be specified in its rules and regulations or in any joint
resolution. Special meetings may be called as specified in the rules and regulations.
(b) The at-large commissioner shall have no vote except that, in the event of a tie in a
vote by the Commission, the at-large commissioner shall break the tie with an additional vote.
House Bill 23 Session Law 2025-67 Page 5

(c) The Commission is subject to the requirements of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes
and Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. All records produced or maintained by
the Commission are public records as defined in G.S. 132-1. The Commission shall maintain a
public website providing the public access to its public records.
"§ 77-89.6. Powers of Commission; administrative provision.
(a) Within the limits of funds available to it and subject to the provisions of this Act
Article and of any joint resolution, the Commission may:may do all of the following:
(1) Hire and Fix fix the compensation of permanent and temporary employees
and staff as it may deem that are necessary in carrying out its duties.
(2) Contract with consultants for such services as it may require.services.
(3) Contract with the State of North Carolina or the Federal Government, federal
government, or any agency or department or subdivision thereof, for such
property or services as may be provided to or by such agencies, and carry out
the provisions of such contracts.or any other person.
(4) Contract with persons, firms, and corporations generally as to all matters over
which it has a proper concern, and carry out the provisions of such contracts.
(5)(4) Lease, rent, purchase, or otherwise obtain suitable quarters and office space
for its employees and staff, staff and lease, rent, purchase, or otherwise obtain
furniture, fixtures, aircraft, vessels, vehicles, firearms, uniforms, and other
supplies and equipment necessary or desirable for carrying out the duties
imposed in or under the authority of this Act.equipment.
(6)(5) Lease, rent, purchase, construct, otherwise obtain, maintain, operate, repair,
and replace, either on its own or in cooperation with other public or private
agencies or individuals, any of the following: parks, shoreline and water
recreational areas, swimming pools and swimming areas, marinas, fishing
piers, boat docks, boating and fishing access areas, navigation aids, waterway
markers, public information signs and notices, and other items of real and
personal property designed to enhance public recreation, public safety in Lake
Norman and its shoreline area, or protection of property in the shoreline area.
(6) Assess fees as provided in G.S. 77-89.9, except as limited by any other
provisions of State or federal law.
(7) Request the Department of Environmental Quality to add certain species of
vegetation and algae, as specifically applicable to Lake Norman and its
shoreline area, to the Aquatic Weed Control Program.
(b) The Commission may accept, receive, and disburse in furtherance of its functions any
funds, grants, services, or property made available by the Federal Government federal
government or its agencies or subdivisions, by the State Government or its agencies or
subdivisions, municipalities and towns or their agencies, or by private and civic sources.
(c) The boards of the four counties participating local governments, municipalities, and
towns bordering Lake Norman may appropriate funds to the Commission out of surplus funds or
funds derived from nontax sources. They may also appropriate funds out of tax revenues and
may also levy annually levy taxes for the payment of such the appropriation as a special purpose,
in addition to any allowed by the Constitution.purpose.
(d) The Commission shall be is subject to such any audit requirements as may be
specified in any joint resolution.
(e) In carrying out some or all of its duties and in either in addition to or in lieu of
exercising various provisions of the above authorizations, the The Commission may, with the
agreement of the board of the county concerned, utilize personnel and property of or assign
responsibilities to any officer or employee of any of the four counties. Such participating local
governments. A contribution in kind, if substantial, may kind may, with the agreement of the
other three counties participating local governments, be deemed to substitute a substitute, in
Page 6 Session Law 2025-67 House Bill 23

whole or in part part, for the financial contribution required of such county the participating local
government in support of the Commission.
(f) Unless otherwise specified by joint resolution, each of the four counties participating
local governments shall annually contribute an equal financial contribution to the Commission
in an amount appropriate to support the activities of the Commission in carrying out its duties.
(g) Before the close of each fiscal year, the Commission shall prepare a budget for the
ensuing year for consideration by the boards of each participating local government for approval.
Upon receiving the budget from the Commission, the board of each participating local
government shall consider the budget and make recommendations as to any changes it deems
advisable. Each participating local government shall complete its action on the Commission's
budget on or before the beginning of the Commission's fiscal year, or such later date as specified
by joint resolution.
"§ 77-89.7. Filing and publication of joint resolutions.
(a) A copy of the joint resolution creating the Commission and of any joint resolution
amending or repealing the joint resolution creating the Commission shall be filed with the
Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission. When the Executive Director
receives resolutions that are in substance identical from all four counties concerned, participating
local governments, the Executive Director shall within ten days so certify and distribute a
certified single resolution text to the following:
(1) The Secretary of State.
(2) The Director of the Department of Local Affairs.
(3)(2) The clerk to the board of each of the four counties.participating local
governments.
(4)(3) The clerk of superior court of each of the four counties.
(4) The Secretary of the Department of Commerce.
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(6) A news outlet serving a general audience throughout the four counties.
Upon request, the Executive Director shall also send a certified single copy of any and all
applicable joint resolutions to the chairman chair of the Commission.
(b) Unless a joint resolution specifies a later date, it shall take takes effect when the
Executive Director's certified text has been submitted to the Secretary of State for filing.
Certifications of the Executive Director under the seal of the Commission as to the text or
amended text of any joint resolution and of the date or dates of submission to the Secretary of
State shall be are admissible in evidence in any court. Certifications by any clerk of superior
court of the text of any certified resolution filed with him the clerk by the Executive Director
shall also be are also admissible in evidence evidence, and the Executive Director's submission
of the resolution for filing to the clerk shall constitute constitutes prima facie evidence that such
the resolution was on the date of submission also submitted for filing with the Secretary of State.
Except for the certificate of a clerk as to receipt and date of submission, no evidence may shall
be admitted in court concerning the submission of the certified text of any resolution by the
Executive Director to any person other than the Secretary of State.
(c) Each participating local government shall incorporate a copy of the text of every joint
resolution in its local code of ordinances, as maintained in accordance with G.S. 153A-49 or
G.S. 160A-77.
"§ 77-89.8. Regulatory authority.
(a) Except as limited in subsection (b) below, by subsection (c) of this section, by
restrictions in any joint resolution, and or by other supervening provisions of law, the
Commission may make regulations applicable to Lake Norman and its shoreline area concerning
all matters relating to or affecting public recreation and water safety. area. These regulations may
shall not conflict with or supersede provisions of general or special Acts or of regulations of State
agencies promulgated under the authority of general law. State or federal law, or the exercise of
House Bill 23 Session Law 2025-67 Page 7

any authority granted under any permit or license issued by any State or federal agency. In lieu
of or in addition to passing regulations supplementary to State law and regulations concerning
the operation of vessels on Lake Norman, these regulations, the Commission may, after public
notice, request that the Wildlife Resources Commission pass local regulations rules on this
subject in accordance with the procedure established in G.S. 75A-15.
(a1) Notwithstanding G.S. 75A-16.2, the Commission shall require any person born on or
after January 1, 1988, to complete a boating education course, approved by the National
Association of Safe Boating Law Administrators (NASBLA) and accepted by the Wildlife
Resources Commission, to operate a motorized watercraft of 20 horsepower or greater on Lake
Norman.
(b) Violation of any regulation of the Commission commanding or prohibiting an act
shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed is a Class 3 misdemeanor, which shall
include a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) but not more than five hundred
dollars ($500.00) per violation.($500.00).
(c) The regulations promulgated under this Section take effect upon passage or upon such
dates as may be stipulated in the regulations except that no regulation may No regulation adopted
under this section shall be enforced unless adequate notice of the regulation has been posted in
or on Lake Norman or its shoreline area. Adequate notice as to a regulation affecting only a
particular location may be by a sign, uniform waterway marker, posted notice, or other effective
method of communicating the essential provisions of the regulation in the immediate vicinity of
the location in question. Where location. If a regulation applies generally as to Lake Norman or
its shoreline area, or both, there must shall be a posting of notices, signs, or markers
communicating the its essential provisions in at least three different places throughout the area.
(d) A copy of each regulation promulgated under this Section must adopted under this
section shall be filed by the Commission with the following persons:
(1) The Secretary of State, in accordance with G.S. 143-195 to - 198.State.
(2) The clerk of superior court of each of the four counties, in accordance with
G.S. 143-198.1.counties.
(3) The Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission.
(4) The Director of the Department of Local Affairs.The Secretary of the
Department of Commerce.
(5) The Secretary of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(6) The General Manager of Water Strategy, Hydro Licensing & Lake Services
for the federal licensee of the Catawba-Wateree Hydro Project (FERC Project
No. 2232).
(e) Any official designated in subsection (d) above of this section may issue certified
copies of regulations filed with him under the seal of his office. Such the official. The certified
copies may be received in evidence in any proceeding.
(e1) Each participating local government shall incorporate a copy of the text of every
regulation adopted by the Commission in its local code of ordinances, as maintained in
accordance with G.S. 153A-49 or G.S. 160A-77.
(f) Publication and filing of regulations promulgated under this Section as required above
is adopted under this section are for informational purposes and shall not be are not a prerequisite
to their validity if they in fact have been duly promulgated, adopted, the public has been notified
as to the substance of the regulations, their substance, a copy of the text of all regulations is in
fact available to any person who that may be affected, and no party to any proceeding has been
prejudiced by any defect that may exist with respect to publication and filing. Rules and
regulations promulgated Regulations adopted by the Commission under the provisions of other
sections of this Act Article relating to internal governance of the Commission need not are not
required to be filed or published. Where If posting of any sign, notice, or marker or the making
of other communication is essential to the validity of a regulation duly promulgated, regulation,
Page 8 Session Law 2025-67 House Bill 23

it shall be is presumed in any proceeding that proper notice was given and maintained and the
burden shall lie lies upon the party asserting to the contrary to prove lack of adequate notice of
any the regulation.
(g) Under authorization of a joint resolution, and subject to the limitations of this section,
the Commission may regulate personal watercraft operation in Lake Norman and from its
shoreline.shoreline area.
"§ 77-89.10. Enforcement.
(a) Where If a joint resolution so provides, all law enforcement officers (or such any
officers as may be designated in the joint resolution) with territorial jurisdiction as to any part of
Lake Norman or its shoreline area shall, area, within the limitations of their subject matter
jurisdiction, have the authority of peace officers in enforcing the laws over all of Lake Norman
and its shoreline area.area, including any applicable ordinances or regulations adopted by local
governments.
(b) Where a joint resolution so provides, the Commission may hire special officers to
patrol and enforce the laws on Lake Norman and its shoreline area. Such special officers shall
have and exercise all the powers of peace officers generally within the area in question and shall
take the oaths and be subject to all provisions of law relating to law enforcement officers.
(c) Unless a joint resolution provides to the contrary, all courts in the four counties, within
the limits of their subject matter jurisdiction, shall have concurrent jurisdiction as to all criminal
offenses arising within the boundaries of Lake Norman and its shoreline area.
(d) Where If a law enforcement officer with jurisdiction over any part of Lake Norman
or its shoreline area is performing duties relating to the enforcement of the laws on Lake Norman
or in its shoreline area, he shall have such the officer also has any extra-territorial jurisdiction as
may be that is necessary to perform such these duties. These duties include investigations any of
the following:
(1) Investigations of crimes an officer reasonably believes have been, or are about
to be, committed within the area in question; traversing area.
(2) Traversing by reasonable routes from one portion of such the area to another
although across territory not within the boundaries of Lake Norman and its
shoreline area; conducting portion even if the route is not contained within the
area.
(3) Conducting prisoners in custody to such a court or detention facilities as may
be authorized by law, although this may involve going outside the area in
question; execution facility even if the court or facility is not within the area.
(4) Execution of process connected with any criminal offense alleged to have
been committed within the boundaries in question, except that such process
may not be executed by virtue of this provision area. This subdivision,
however, does not apply beyond the boundaries of the four continuing
counties;counties.
(5) Continuing pursuit of and arresting any violator or suspected violator as to
which whose grounds for arrest arose within the area in question.area.
(e) Where If any law enforcement officers are given additional territorial jurisdiction
under the provisions of this Section, this section, this shall be section is deemed an extension of
the duties of the office held and no officer shall take any additional oath or title of office."
SECTION 5.1.(d) Article 6B of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, as enacted by
subsection (a) of this section and amended by subsections (b) and (c) of this section, is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 77-89.9. Fees.
(a) Except as limited by any other provisions of State or federal law, the Commission
may assess fees related only to the following:
House Bill 23 Session Law 2025-67 Page 9

(1) Participation in education, training, or certification services provided by the
Commission.
(2) Use of facilities owned or operated by the Commission.
(3) Application for a permit administered by the Commission to regulate
privileged or special uses of Lake Norman and its shoreline area.
(b) In setting fee amounts to be charged for activities provided in subsection (a) of this
section, the Commission shall not do any of the following:
(1) Set a fee in an excessive amount that is neither reasonable nor customary for
the services and privileges provided by the Commission.
(2) Set a fee in an amount that exceeds the Commission's actual costs for the
service provided.
(3) Charge fees for general access to or use of Lake Norman or its shoreline area.
(4) Discriminate on the basis of race, color, sex, religious creed, or national origin.
(c) Each year by January 31, the Commission shall produce a publicly available and
auditable report that includes an accounting of all of its fee collections and funding from other
sources compared to its program-specific expenses during the prior calendar year. This annual
financial report shall include adequate detail to determine that the Commission has met each of
the requirements of this section, accompanied by a formal written certification of the same by
the chair of the Commission. If there is a surplus of fee collections or funding in a given calendar
year, it shall be applied to program-specific expenses for the next calendar year."
SECTION 5.2. G.S. 138A-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 138A-3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(70) Public servants. – All of the following:
…
w. Commissioners appointed to the Lake Norman Marine Commission.
…."
SECTION 5.3. G.S. 77-113 reads as rewritten:
"§ 77-113. Membership; terms of office; eligibility for appointment; meetings.
(a) The Catawba/Wateree River Basin Advisory Commission shall be composed of 15
members as follows:
…
(10) One person to represent the following commissions, appointed jointly by the
three chief executive officers chairs of the commissions: the Lake Wylie
Marine Commission established pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 77 of the
General Statutes, the Mountain Island Lake Marine Commission established
pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, and the Lake
Norman Marine Commission established pursuant to Chapter 1089 of the
1969 Session Laws.Article 6B of Chapter 77 of the General Statutes.
…
(c) Each member appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of
subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority so
long as the member remains a Representative or Senator. Each member appointed to the
commissions pursuant to subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall
serve as provided by the General Assembly of South Carolina. Each member appointed to the
commissions pursuant to subdivisions (7) through (9) of subsection (a) and subdivisions (8)
through (10) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve for so long as the member continues in
the qualifying position or, if the member is a designee, at the pleasure of the designating
authority. Each member appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (6) and (10) of
subsection (a) and subdivisions (7) and (11) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve a term of
Page 10 Session Law 2025-67 House Bill 23

two years and may be reappointed to serve no more than three consecutive full terms or 84
consecutive months, whichever is greater. The term of a person appointed to the commission
pursuant to subdivision (10) of subsection (a) of this section shall expire expires on 1 January of
even-numbered years. The term of a person appointed to the commission pursuant to subdivision
(6) of subsection (a) of this section shall expire expires on 1 January of odd-numbered years. The
term of a member who is appointed to the commissions pursuant to subdivisions (5) and (11) of
subsection (a) and subdivisions (5) and (6) of subsection (b) of this section shall serve as provided
by the General Assembly of South Carolina. An appointment to fill a vacancy on the commissions
shall be for the unexpired portion of the term. A vacancy on the commissions shall be filled in
the same manner as the original appointment. Members of the commissions who are appointed
from or reside in North Carolina may be removed by the Governor of North Carolina for
misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance, as provided in G.S. 143B-13.
…
(f) Each commission shall meet upon the call of the Chair. A majority of each
commission shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
…."
SECTION 5.4. The initial appointments to the governing board of the Lake Norman
Marine Commission will become effective on the date that is seven calendar days following the
adoption by three or more eligible local governments of a joint resolution reconstituting the Lake
Norman Marine Commission.
SECTION 5.5. All rules, regulations, and decisions made by the predecessor Lake
Norman Marine Commission, reconstituted in accordance with this Part, shall remain in full force
and effect until and unless duly modified by the successor entity.
PART VI. ROAD AND BRIDGE NAMING DESIGNATIONS
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department
of Transportation shall make the following naming designations:
(1) The bridge on North Carolina Highway 904 that crosses the Columbus and
Robeson County Line, also known as Robeson Bridge 31, shall be renamed
the "Assistant Chief Lenneau D. Hammond Bridge."
(2) The bridge on Rock Barn Road NE that crosses Interstate 40, also known as
Catawba Bridge 173, shall be renamed the "Mayor Bruce R. Eckard Bridge."
(3) Complex Street located in the Town of Tabor City shall be renamed "Shane
Miller Street."
PART VII. AMEND THE NORTH CAROLINA STATE BUILDING CODE TO ALLOW
CERTAIN UNLIMITED AREA BUILDING CLEARANCES TO INCLUDE RAILROAD
RIGHTS-OF-WAY
SECTION 7.(a) Definitions. – For the purposes of this section, the following
definitions apply:
(1) Code. – The North Carolina State Building Code, and amendments to the
Code, as adopted by the Councils.
(2) Councils. – The Residential Code Council and the Building Code Council.
SECTION 7.(b) Unlimited Area Building Conversions. – Until the effective date of
the rules to amend Section 507, Unlimited Area Buildings, are adopted in accordance with this
section, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, the Councils, and State and local governments
enforcing the Code shall adhere to requirements as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 7.(c) Implementation. – For the purposes of application of Section 507.4
and Section 507.5 of the North Carolina Building Code, "public ways" shall include railroad
rights-of-way, provided that a building or structure meet the following additional requirements:
House Bill 23 Session Law 2025-67 Page 11

(1) The building or structure will consist of new nonseparated mixed use
occupancies within an existing building.
(2) The building or structure is located on a single parcel of land which is between
8 acres and 10 acres.
(3) The building or structure is located on a single parcel of land which abuts a
railroad right-of-way for a distance of less than 1,200 feet along the parcel
boundary.
(4) The building or structure footprint is between 150,000 square feet and 300,000
square feet in area.
(5) The building or structure prior to improvement or occupancy change was
previously classified as a Factory Group F occupancy.
SECTION 7.(d) Additional Building Code Council Rulemaking Authority. – The
Building Code Council shall adopt rules to amend the North Carolina Building Code consistent
with subsection (c) of this section. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rules adopted by the
Building Code Council pursuant to this subsection shall be substantively identical to the
provisions of subsection (c) of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are not
subject to Part 3 of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Rules adopted pursuant
to this subsection shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), as though 10 or
more written objections had been received as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b2).
SECTION 7.(e) Sunset. – This section expires when permanent rules adopted as
required by subsection (d) of this section become effective.
PART VIII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 3:15 p.m. this 7th day of July, 2025
Page 12 Session Law 2025-67 House Bill 23